Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB295.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1203.1 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, added November 12, 2025 (P.L.244, No.47), is amended to read:Section 1203.1. State Certificate Fee [Reduction].--[Certificate fees assessed by the Department of Education related to the review of certificate eligibility for issuance of certificates under section 1201 may not be more than fifty dollars ($50).] In addition to fees currently collected in accordance with section 1216.1, the Department of Education may fix and collect reasonable fees for the review of certificate eligibility for issuance of certificates under section 1201 which shall be no more than fifty dollars ($50). All fees 1234567891011121314151617181920 collected by the department under this section shall be deposited into the Talent Recruitment Account established under section 1505-K.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB0295PN1843 - 2 - 1234